Ohio, session 136, HB927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2907.07 and 2921.32 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2907.07. (A)(1) No person shall solicit a person who is less than thirteen years of age to engage in sexual activity with the offender, whether or not the offender knows the age of such person. (2) No person shall knowingly solicit another person who the offender believes to be under eighteen years of age to engage in sexual activity, regardless of the actual age of the person solicited. (B)(1) No person shall solicit another, not the spouse of the offender, to engage in sexual conduct with the offender, when the offender is eighteen years of age or older and four or more years older than the other person, and the other person is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age, whether or not the offender knows the age of the other person. (2) No person shall solicit another to engage in sexual conduct with the offender, when the offender is eighteen years of age or older and four or more years older than the other person, the other person is sixteen or seventeen years of age and a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code, and the offender knows or has reckless disregard of the age of the other person. (C) No person shall solicit a person who is less than sixteen years of age to engage in sexual activity with the offender when the person who is less than sixteen years of age is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition. (D) No person shall solicit another by means of a telecommunications device, as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, to engage in sexual activity with the offender when the offender is eighteen years of age or older and either of the following applies: (1) The other person is less than thirteen years of age, and the offender knows that the other person is less than thirteen years of age or is reckless in that regard. (2) The other person is a law enforcement officer posing as a person who is less than thirteen years of age, and the offender believes that the other person is less than thirteen years of age or is reckless in that regard. (E) No person shall solicit another by means of a telecommunications device, as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, to engage in sexual activity with the offender when the offender is eighteen years of age or older and either of the following applies: (1) The other person is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age, the offender knows that the other person is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age or is reckless in that regard, and the offender is four or more years older than the other person. (2) The other person is a law enforcement officer posing as a person who is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age, the offender believes that the other person is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age or is reckless in that regard, and the offender is four or more years older than the age the law enforcement officer assumes in posing as the person who is thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age. (F) Divisions (D) and (E) of this section apply to any solicitation that is contained in a transmission via a telecommunications device that either originates in this state or is received in this state. (G)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of importuning. (2) A violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. A violation of division (A)(A)(1), (C), or (D) of this section is a felony of the third degree on a first offense, and, notwithstanding division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, there is a presumption that a prison term shall be imposed as described in division (D) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. If the offender, in addition to soliciting the other person, arranged to meet the other person for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity, the court shall impose upon the offender as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense, a violation of division (A)(A)(1), (C), or (D) of this section is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose upon the offender as a mandatory prison term one of the definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the second degree, except that if the violation is committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed in division (A)(2)(a) of that section for a felony of the second degree. (3) A violation of division (B) or (E) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense, and, notwithstanding division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, there is a presumption that a prison term shall be imposed as described in division (D) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. The court shall impose upon the offender as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the fifth degree if both of the following apply: (a) Either of the following applies: (i) The offender is ten or more years older than the other person. (ii) Regarding a violation of division (E)(2) of this section, a law enforcement officer posed as a person thirteen years of age or older but less than sixteen years of age and the offender is ten or more years older than the officer claimed to be. (b) In addition to soliciting the other person, the offender arranged to meet the other person for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity. (4) If the offender previously has been convicted of a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense, a violation of division (B) or (E) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree, and the court shall impose upon the offender as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the fourth degree that is not less than twelve months in duration. Sec. 2921.32. (A) No person, with purpose to hinder the discovery, apprehension, prosecution, conviction, or punishment of another for crime or to assist another to benefit from the commission of a crime, and no person, with purpose to hinder the discovery, apprehension, prosecution, adjudication as a delinquent child, or disposition of a child for an act that if committed by an adult would be a crime or to assist a child to benefit from the commission of an act that if committed by an adult would be a crime, shall do any of the following: (1) Harbor or conceal the other person or child; (2) Provide the other person or child with money, transportation, a weapon, a disguise, or other means of avoiding discovery or apprehension; (3) Warn the other person or child of impending discovery or apprehension; (4) Destroy or conceal physical evidence of the crime or act, or induce any person to withhold testimony or information or to elude legal process summoning the person to testify or supply evidence; (5) Communicate false information to any person; (6) Prevent or obstruct any person, by means of force, intimidation, or deception, from performing any act to aid in the discovery, apprehension, or prosecution of the other person or child; (7) Fail to immediately report to law enforcement authorities knowledge that an individual who is eighteen years of age or older is attempting to meet with another person who is under eighteen years of age and more than four years younger than the individual for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity. (B) A person may be prosecuted for, and may be convicted of or adjudicated a delinquent child for committing, a violation of division (A) of this section regardless of whether the person or child aided ultimately is apprehended for, is charged with, is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing the crime or act the person or child aided committed. The crime or act the person or child aided committed shall be used under division (C) of this section in determining the penalty for the violation of division (A) of this section, regardless of whether the person or child aided ultimately is apprehended for, is charged with, is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing the crime or act the person or child aided committed. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of obstructing justice. (2) If the crime committed by the person aided is a misdemeanor or if the act committed by the child aided would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, obstructing justice is a misdemeanor of the same degree as the crime committed by the person aided or a misdemeanor of the same degree that the act committed by the child aided would be if committed by an adult. (3) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (C)(4), (5), and (6) of this section, if the crime committed by the person aided is a felony or if the act committed by the child aided would be a felony if committed by an adult, obstructing justice is a felony of the fifth degree. (4) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(6) of this section, if the crime committed by the person aided is aggravated murder, murder, or a felony of the first or second degree or if the act committed by the child aided would be one of those offenses if committed by an adult and if the offender knows or has reason to believe that the crime committed by the person aided is one of those offenses or that the act committed by the child aided would be one of those offenses if committed by an adult, obstructing justice is a felony of the third degree. (5) If the crime or act committed by the person or child aided is an act of terrorism, obstructing justice is one of the following: (a) Except as provided in division (C)(5)(b) of this section, a felony of the second degree; (b) If the act of terrorism resulted in the death of a person who was not a participant in the act of terrorism, a felony of the first degree. (6) If the crime committed by the person is trafficking in persons or if the act committed by the child aided would be trafficking in persons if committed by an adult, obstructing justice is a felony of the second degree. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Adult" and "child" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (2) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Act of terrorism" has the same meaning as in section 2909.21 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2907.07 and 2921.32 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.